Washington statutes.
RCW 18.46.060

Rules.

The department, after consultation with representatives of birthing center operators, state medical association, Washington Osteopathic Association, state nurses association, state hospital association, state midwives association, and any other representatives as the department may deem necessary, shall adopt, amend, and promulgate such rules and regulations with respect to all birthing centers in the promotion of safe and adequate medical and nursing care in the birthing center and the sanitary, hygienic, and safe condition of the birthing center in the interest of the health, safety, and welfare of the people.

[ 2000 c 93 s 33; 1985 c 213 s 10; 1951 c 168 s 7.]

NOTES:

Savings—Effective date—1985 c 213: See notes following RCW 43.20.050.